Florida, session 2026, SB1200.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 48 49 Section 1.âSubsections (2), (3), and (9) of section 50 514.0115, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 51 514.0115âExemptions from supervision or regulation; 52 variances.â 53 (2)(a)âPools serving no more than 32 condominium or 54 cooperative units which are not operated as a public lodging 55 establishment are shall be exempt from supervision under this 56 chapter, except for supervision necessary to ensure water 57 quality and an annual inspection to ensure compliance with 58 sanitary and entrapment standards, including, but not limited 59 to, all of the following standards: 60 1.âPools must comply with the federal Virginia Graeme Baker 61 Pool and Spa Safety Act. 62 2.âPools must be operated at the designed flow rate. 63 3.âA poolâs filtration system must have capacity equal to 64 or greater than the originally designed filter capacity, use the 65 same filter media as originally designed, and be operated as 66 originally designed, either as suction or pressure. 67 (b)âPools serving condominium or cooperative associations 68 of more than 32 units and whose recorded documents prohibit the 69 rental or sublease of the units for periods of less than 60 days 70 are exempt from supervision under this chapter, except that the 71 condominium or cooperative owner or association must file 72 applications with the department and obtain construction plans 73 approval and receive an initial operating permit. The department 74 shall inspect the swimming pools at such places annually, at the 75 fee set forth in s. 514.033(3), or upon request by a unit owner, 76 to determine compliance with department rules relating to water 77 quality and lifesaving equipment, compliance with the federal 78 Virginia Graeme Baker Pool and Spa Safety Act, and whether the 79 pool is being operated at the designed and permitted flow rate 80 and its filtration system is in place and being operated as 81 originally engineered and permitted. The department may not 82 require compliance with rules relating to swimming pool 83 lifeguard standards. 84 (3)âPools serving homeownersâ associations and other 85 property associations which have no more than 32 units or 86 parcels and are not operated as public lodging establishments 87 are exempt from supervision under this chapter, except that such 88 pools are subject to ss. 514.05 and 514.06 and for supervision 89 necessary to ensure water quality and compliance with s. 90 514.0315, and sanitary and entrapment standards. The department 91 shall inspect swimming pools at such places annually to ensure 92 compliance with the sanitary and entrapment standards, 93 including, but not limited to, all of the following standards: 94 (a)âPools must comply with the federal Virginia Graeme 95 Baker Pool and Spa Safety Act. 96 (b)âPools must be operated at the designed flow rate. 97 (c)âA poolâs filtration system must have capacity equal to 98 or greater than the originally designed filter capacity, use the 99 same filter media as originally designed, and be operated as 100 originally designed, either as suction or pressure are subject 101 to ss. 514.05 and 514.06. 102 (9)âThe department may grant variances from any rule 103 adopted under this chapter pursuant to procedures adopted by 104 department rule. The department may also grant, pursuant to 105 procedures adopted by department rule, variances from the 106 provisions of the Florida Building Code specifically pertaining 107 to public swimming pools and bathing places when requested by 108 the pool owner or the pool ownerâs representative to relieve 109 hardship in cases involving deviations from the Florida Building 110 Code provisions, when it is shown that the hardship was not 111 caused intentionally by the action of the applicant, where no 112 reasonable alternative exists, and the health and safety of the 113 pool patrons is not at risk. The Public Swimming Pool and Spa 114 Technical Committee established under s. 514.028 has the sole 115 authority within the department to review and approve variances 116 under this section. 117 Section 2.âSection 514.021, Florida Statutes, is amended to 118 read: 119 514.021âDepartment authorization.â 120 (1)âThe Public Swimming Pool and Spa Technical Committee 121 established under s. 514.028 shall adopt and the department 122 shall may adopt and enforce rules for the operation of public 123 swimming pools and public bathing places, including to protect 124 the health, safety, or welfare of persons by setting sanitation 125 and safety standards for public swimming pools and public 126 bathing places. The department shall review and revise such 127 rules as necessary, but not less than biennially. Sanitation and 128 safety standards are shall be limited to matters relating to 129 source of water supply; microbiological, chemical, and physical 130 quality of water in the pool or bathing area; and method of 131 water purification, treatment, and disinfection; lifesaving 132 apparatus; and measures to ensure safety of bathers. 133 (2)âThe Public Swimming Pool and Spa Technical Committee or 134 the department may not establish by rule any regulation 135 governing the design, alteration, modification, or repair of 136 public swimming pools and bathing places which has no impact on 137 sanitation and safety of persons using public swimming pools and 138 bathing places. Further, the committee or the department may not 139 adopt by rule any regulation governing the construction, 140 erection, or demolition of public swimming pools and bathing 141 places. It is the intent of the Legislature to preempt those 142 functions to the Florida Building Commission through adoption 143 and maintenance of the Florida Building Code. The department 144 shall provide technical assistance to the commission in updating 145 the construction standards of the Florida Building Code which 146 govern public swimming pools. This subsection does not abrogate 147 the authority of the committee to adopt and the department to 148 adopt and enforce appropriate sanitary regulations and 149 requirements as authorized in subsection (1). 150 Section 3.âSubsection (4) is added to section 514.025, 151 Florida Statutes, to read: 152 514.025âAssignment of authority to county health 153 departments.â 154 (4)âDepartment and county health department employees 155 assigned to the inspection and regulation of public swimming 156 pools, spas, or bathing facilities must, within 60 days after 157 employment or assignment to the inspection and regulation of 158 public swimming pools, spas, or bathing facilities, obtain the 159 Florida Public Pool Specialist Certification developed by the 160 Florida Swimming Pool Association and approved by the 161 department. The certification must be renewed every 5 years, and 162 employees must maintain this certification for as long as they 163 are assigned to the inspection and regulation of public swimming 164 pools, spas, or bathing facilities. The department or county 165 health department, as applicable, shall bear the cost of 166 certification, including certification renewals, of employees 167 under this subsection. 168 Section 4.âSection 514.028, Florida Statutes, is amended to 169 read: 170 514.028âPublic Swimming Pool and Spa Technical Committee 171 Advisory review board.â 172 (1)âThe Governor shall appoint the Public Swimming Pool and 173 Spa Technical Committee, an advisory review board which shall 174 meet as necessary and or at least bimonthly quarterly, to review 175 and act on variance applications under s. 514.0115 recommend 176 agency action on variance request, rule and policy development, 177 and other technical review problems. The board shall be composed 178 comprised of: 179 (a)âThree commercial swimming pool/spa contractors A 180 representative from the office of licensure and certification of 181 the department. 182 (b)âTwo swimming pool/spa servicing contractors A 183 representative from the county health departments. 184 (c)âTwo professional engineers, licensed and practicing in 185 this state Three representatives from the swimming pool 186 construction industry. 187 (d)âTwo representatives A representative from the public 188 lodging industry. 189 (e)âA representative from a county or local building 190 department. 191 (2)âNotwithstanding s. 120.54, the committee shall hold a 192 public workshop to develop each rule proposed under s. 514.021 193 and provide a notice of rule development at least 45 days before 194 the date on which the workshop is scheduled to be held. In 195 addition, each notice of proposed rule must be published in the 196 Florida Administrative Register at least 45 days before the 197 intended action The purpose of the advisory review board is to 198 promote better relations, understanding, and cooperation between 199 such industries and the department; to review and make 200 recommendations regarding department product approval standards; 201 to suggest means of better protecting the health, welfare, or 202 safety of persons using the services offered by such industries; 203 and to give the department the benefit of the knowledge and 204 experience of the board concerning the industries and individual 205 businesses affected by the laws and rules administered by the 206 department. 207 (3)âThe purpose of the committee is to: 208 (a)âConsider and adopt modifications to rules for the 209 operation of public swimming pools and public bathing places 210 pursuant to s. 514.021(1); and 211 (b)âReview and act on variance applications under s. 212 514.0115. 213 (4)âMembers shall be reimbursed for travel expenses 214 incurred in connection with service on the committee advisory 215 review board pursuant to s. 112.061. 216 Section 5.âSubsection (1) of section 514.03, Florida 217 Statutes, is amended, and subsection(3) is added to that 218 section, to read: 219 514.03âApproval necessary to construct, develop, or modify 220 public swimming pools or public bathing places.â 221 (1)âA person or public body desiring to construct, develop, 222 or modify a public swimming pool must submit an application, 223 containing the information required under s. 514.031(1)(a)1.-5. 224 s. 514.031(1)(a)1.-6. to the department for an operating permit 225 before filing an application for a building permit under s. 226 553.79. A copy of the final inspection required under s. 227 514.031(1)(a)5. shall be submitted to the department upon 228 receipt by the applicant. The application shall be deemed 229 incomplete pursuant to s. 120.60 until such copy is submitted to 230 the department. 231 (3)âThe department or county health department may not 232 require engineered plans for or re-engineering of a swimming 233 pool, a spa pool, a wading pool, or an interactive water feature 234 to be submitted for equipment replacements if such replacement 235 equipment meets the originally designed flow, filtration, and 236 sanitation specifications, regardless of the equipment type, 237 make, or model. The pool/spa contractor, as defined in s. 238 489.105(3)(j), (k), or (l), performing the equipment replacement 239 is responsible for certifying that the replacement meets the 240 originally designed flow, filtration, and sanitation 241 specifications of the swimming pool, spa pool, wading pool, or 242 interactive water feature. 243 Section 6.âSubsection (1) of section 514.031, Florida 244 Statutes, is amended to read: 245 514.031âPermit necessary to operate public swimming pool.â 246 (1)âIt is unlawful for any person or public body to operate 247 or continue to operate any public swimming pool without a valid 248 permit from the department, such permit to be obtained in the 249 following manner: 250 (a)âAny person or public body desiring to operate any 251 public swimming pool must shall file an application for an 252 operating permit with the department, on application forms 253 provided by the department, and must shall accompany such 254 application with: 255 1.âA description of the structure, its appurtenances, and 256 its operation. 257 2.âA description of the source or sources of water supply, 258 and the amount and quality of water available and intended to be 259 used. 260 3.âThe method and manner of water purification, treatment, 261 disinfection, and heating. 262 4.âThe safety equipment and standards to be used. 263 5.âA copy of the final inspection from the local 264 enforcement agency as defined in s. 553.71. 265 6.âAny other pertinent information deemed necessary by the 266 department. 267 (b)âThe applicant must shall respond to a request for 268 additional information due to an incomplete application for an 269 operating permit pursuant to s. 120.60. Upon receipt of an 270 application, whether complete or incomplete, as required in s. 271 514.03 and as set forth under this section, the department shall 272 review and provide to the local enforcement agency and the 273 applicant any comment or proposed modifications on the 274 information received pursuant to subparagraphs (a)1.-5. (a)1.-6. 275 (c)âThe department shall grant the application for permit, 276 unless If the department determines by clear and convincing 277 evidence that the public swimming pool will not is or may 278 reasonably be expected to be operated in compliance with this 279 chapter and the rules adopted hereunder, the department shall 280 grant the application for permit. 281 (d)âIf the department determines that the public swimming 282 pool does not meet the provisions outlined in this chapter or 283 the rules adopted hereunder, the department must shall deny the 284 application for a permit pursuant to the provisions of chapter 285 120. Such denial must shall be in writing and must shall list 286 the circumstances for the denial. Upon correction of such 287 circumstances, an applicant previously denied permission to 288 operate a public swimming pool or bathing place may reapply for 289 a permit. 290 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.